New Jersey, session 222, S2588.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, where a person has purchased a motor vehicle through financing, where a lien has been noted on the certificate of ownership, and where the person has made final payment to satisfy the lien, the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission shall not charge a fee to re-issue the certificate of ownership to the person with the lien no longer noted on the certificate. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.